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DTC P27 16/77PressureControlSolenoid”D”Electrical
(Shift Solenoid Valve SLT)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
The throttle pressure that is applied to the primary regulator
valve (which modulates line pressure) causes the solenoid
valve SLT, under electronic control, to precisely and minutely
modulate and generate line pressure according to the accelera-
tor pedal effort, or the detected engine power output.
This controls the line pressure and provides smooth shifting
characteristics.
Uponreceiving the throttlevalveopeninganglesignal,Engine

and ECT ECU controls the line pressure by sending a predeter-
mined (*) duty ratio to the solenoid valve, modulating the line
pressure, and generating throttle pressure.
(*) Duty Ratio
The duty ratio is the ratio of the period of continuity in one cycle.
For example, if A is the period of continuity in one cycle, and B
is theperiodofnon −continuity, then

DTC No. DTC Detection Condition Trouble Area

P2716/77
Engine and ECT ECU detects solenoid SLT circuit malfunction
for1sec.ormore (1 −tripdetection logic)
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check transmission wire.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the transmission wire connector.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between SLT

+ 
and SLT

− of transmission
wire.
OK:

Resistance: 5.0 − 5.6 � at 20˚ C (68˚ F)
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminals SLT

+ 
and SLT

− of the
transmission wire connector and body ground.
OK:

Resistance: 1 M � or higher

NG Go to step 3.

OK

2 Measure resistance between terminal SLT
+ 

and SLT
− of Engine and ECT ECU

connector.

PREPARATION:
(a) Connect the transmission wire connector.
(b) Disconnect the connector of the Engine and ECT ECU.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminals SLT

+ 
and SLT

− of En-
gine and ECT ECU connector.
OK:

Resistance: 5.0 − 5.6 � at 20˚ C (68˚ F)
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminals SLT

+ 
and SLT

− of the
Engine and ECT ECU connector and body ground.
OK:

Resistance: 1 M � or higher

NG Repair or replace the harness or connector
(See page IN−38).

OK

Check and replace the Engine and ECT ECU
(See page IN−38).
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3 Check shift solenoid valve SLT.

PREPARATION:
(a) Jack up the vehicle.
(b) Remove the oil pan.
(c) Remove the shift solenoid valve SLT.
CHECK:
(a) Measure the resistance between terminals 1 and 2 of so-

lenoid connector.
Standard: 5.0 − 5.6 � at 20˚ C (68˚ F)

(b) Connect the positive (+) lead with an 21 W bulb to terminal
2 of solenoid connector and negative (−) lead to terminal
1 of the solenoid valve connector, then check the move-
ment of the valve.
Standard: Solenoid sounds operation noise.

OK:
Standard

NG Replace the shift solenoid valve SLT
(See page AT−8) .

OK

Repair or replace the transmission wire
(See page AT−6) .


